Washington statutes.
RCW 41.18.090

Examination of disability pensioners—Restoration to active duty.

The board shall require all firefighters receiving disability pensions to be examined every six months: PROVIDED, That no such examinations shall be required if upon certification by physicians the board shall formally enter upon its records a finding of fact that the disability is and will continue to be of such a nature that return to active duty can never reasonably be expected. All examinations shall be made by physicians duly appointed by the board. If a firefighter shall willfully fail to present himself or herself for examination, within thirty days after being ordered so to do, he or she shall forfeit all rights under this chapter. If such firefighter, upon examination as aforesaid, shall be found fit for service, he or she shall be restored to duty in the same rank held at the time of his or her retirement, or if unable to perform the duties of said rank then, at his or her request, in such other like or lesser rank as may be or become open and available, the duties of which he or she is then able to perform. The board shall thereupon so notify the firefighter and shall require him or her to resume his or her duties as a member of the fire department. If, upon being so notified, such member shall willfully fail to report for employment within ten days, he or she shall forfeit all rights to any benefit under this chapter.

[ 2007 c 218 s 50; 1955 c 382 s 15.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.